New Jersey, session 221, A4491.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.19:3-27 is amended to read as follows: 19:3-27.  When a vacancy shall happen in the representation of this state in the United States [house of representatives] House of Representatives, it shall be the duty of the [governor] Governor to issue a writ of election to fill such vacancy, unless the term of service for which the person whose office shall become vacant will expire within six months next after the happening of the vacancy, and except as otherwise provided under section 1 of P.L.1945, c.206 (C.19:27-10.1). (cf: R.S.19:3-27) 2.  R.S.19:27-4 is amended to read as follows: 19:27-4.  When any vacancy happens in the representation of this State in the United States Senate or in the House of Representatives, the Governor shall, within 10 days of the occurrence of the vacancy, issue a writ of election to fill the same unless the term of service of the person whose office shall become vacant will expire within six months next after the happening of the vacancy and except as hereinafter provided. (cf: P.L.1988, c.126, s.2) 3.  R.S.19:27-6 is amended to read as follows: 19:27-6.  In the case of a vacancy in the representation of this State in the United States Senate [or House of Representatives], the writ may designate the next general election day for the election, but if a special day is designated, it shall specify the cause and purpose of such election, the name of the officer in whose office the vacancy has occurred, the day on which a special primary election shall be held, which shall be not less than 70 days nor more than 76 days following the date of such proclamation, and the day on which the special election shall be held, which shall be not less than 64 nor more than 70 days following the day of the special primary election.  The writ shall also specify the day or days when the district boards shall meet for the purpose of making, revising or correcting the registers of voters to be used at such special election. If the vacancy happens in the representation of this State in the United States Senate the election shall take place at the general election next succeeding the happening thereof, unless the vacancy shall happen within 70 days next preceding the primary election prior to the general election, in which case it shall be filled by election at the second succeeding election, unless the Governor shall deem it advisable to call a special election therefor, which he is authorized hereby to do. [If the vacancy happens in the representation of this State in the House of Representatives in any year, not later than the 70th day prior to the day for holding the next primary election for the general election, the Governor shall issue a writ of election to fill such vacancy, designating in said writ the next general election day as the day on which the election shall be held to fill such vacancy. The nomination of candidates to fill such vacancy shall be made in the same manner as the nomination of other candidates at the said primary election for the general election.] (cf: P.L.2011, c.37, s.17) 4.  Section 1 of P.L.1945, c.206 (C.19:27-10.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  In the case of a vacancy in the representation of this State in the House of Representatives, the writ shall designate the next general election day for the election pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, or shall designate a special day for the election pursuant to paragraphs (2) or (3) of subsection b. of this section. If a special day is designated for the election, the writ shall specify the cause and purpose of such election, the name of the officer in whose office the vacancy has occurred, and the day on which the special election shall be held.  The writ shall also specify the day or days when the district boards shall meet for the purpose of making, revising, or correcting the registers of voters to be used at such special election. b. (1) When a vacancy, howsoever caused, happens in the representation of this State in the House of Representatives in any year [later than the 70th day prior to the day for holding the primary election for the general election but] not earlier than July 1 but on or before the 70th day preceding the day of the general election, [and the unexpired term to be filled exceeds one year,] the Governor, in issuing a writ of election to fill such vacancy, [may] shall designate in said writ the next general election day as the day on which the election shall be held to fill such vacancy and that no primary election shall be held for nomination of candidates to fill such vacancy. (2) When a vacancy, howsoever caused, happens in the representation of this State in the House of Representatives in any year earlier than July 1, the Governor, in issuing a writ of election to fill such vacancy, shall designate in said writ a special day as the day on which the election shall be held to fill such vacancy and that no primary election shall be held for the nomination of candidates to fill such vacancy. The day on which the special election shall be held shall be not less than 70 days nor more than 80 days following the issuance of the writ of election. (3) When a vacancy, howsoever caused, happens in the representation of this State in the House of Representatives after the 70th day preceding the day of the general election and the unexpired term to be filled exceeds one year, the Governor, in issuing a writ of election to fill such vacancy, shall designate in said writ a special day as the day on which the election shall be held to fill such vacancy and that no primary election shall be held for the nomination of candidates to fill such vacancy. The day on which the special election shall be held shall be not less than 70 days nor more than 80 days following the issuance of the writ of election. c.  In [such case] any general or special election to be held to fill a vacancy in the representation of this State in the House of Representatives pursuant to subsection b. of this section, each political party shall select its candidate to fill such vacancy in the same manner prescribed in R.S.19:13-20 for selecting candidates to fill vacancies arising among candidates nominated at primary elections, except that the time for making such selection and filing the statement thereof shall be within 10 days following the issuance of the writ of election, but not later than 68 days before the election. In such case, petitions of nomination of other candidates shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State within 10 days of the date of such proclamation, but not later than 68 days before the election. The Secretary of State [on the eleventh day following the date of such proclamation] shall promptly certify to the clerk and county board of each county affected by the vacancy, a statement of all candidates selected and nominated for the office so vacated. The election to fill such vacancy shall in all other respects be conducted as though it were being conducted to fill the office upon the expiration of the term of the incumbent. (cf: P.L.2011, c.37, s.18) 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.